Utah statutes.
19-10-106.   Enforcement and inspection regarding institutional controls.

(1)  An environmental institutional control may be enforced or protected by a temporary restraining order or an injunction obtained in a court of competent jurisdiction by the department or other affected parties.

(2)  In addition to injunctive relief, the department is entitled to recover costs for actions which, in its discretion, it may take in enforcing and protecting the institutional controls.

(3)  The department may enter the property at reasonable times to ensure compliance with the environmental institutional controls.

